Washington statutes.
RCW 34.08.050

Institutions of higher education considered state agencies for certain purposes.

For the purposes of the state register and this chapter, an institution of higher education, as defined in RCW 34.05.010, shall be considered to be a state agency.

[ 1989 c 175 s 32; 1977 ex.s. c 240 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.